zh-CN: 船舶螺旋桨叶片倾角: 高斜角; 低斜角; 中斜角; 渐进斜角; 其他
fi: Vesikulkuneuvon potkurin lavan nousu: Korkea kallistus; Pieni kallistus; Keskitason kallistus; Progressiivinen kallistus; Muu
sk-SK: Uhol sklonu lopatky lodnej vrtule: Vysoký sklon (rake); Nízky sklon; Stredný sklon; Progresívny sklon; Iné
nl: Watervaartuig propellerblad rake: Hoge rake; Lage rake; Gemiddelde rake; Progressieve rake; Overige
vi: Góc nghiêng cánh quạt tàu thủy: Góc nghiêng lớn; Góc nghiêng nhỏ; Góc nghiêng vừa; Góc nghiêng lũy tiến; Khác
ro-RO: Înclinarea paletei elicei ambarcațiunii: Înclinare mare; Înclinare mică; Înclinare medie; Înclinare progresivă; Altele
sl-SI: Nagib rezila propelerja plovila: Visok nagib; Nizek nagib; Srednji nagib; Progresivni nagib; Drugo
hr-HR: Grablje lopatica propelera plovila: Veliki nagib; Mali nagib; Srednji nagib; Progresivni nagib; Ostalo
ko: 선박 프로펠러 블레이드 레이크: 하이 레이크; 로우 레이크; 미디엄 레이크; 프로그레시브 레이크; 기타
sv: Vattenfarkostens propellerbladslutning: Hög rake; Låg rake; Medel rake; Progressiv rake; Övrigt
bg-BG: Ъгъл на наклон на лопатките на витлото за плавателен съд: Голям наклон; Малък наклон; Среден наклон; Прогресивен наклон; Други
ja: 水上船舶プロペラブレードレーキ角: ハイレーキ; ローレーキ; ミディアムレーキ; プログレッシブレーキ; その他
pt-BR: Hélice de embarcação inclinação das pás: Rake alto; Rake baixo; Rake médio; Rake progressivo; Outros
pl: Rake łopaty śruby napędowej jednostki pływającej: Duże pochylenie; Małe pochylenie; Średnie pochylenie; Progresywne pochylenie; Inne
da: Bladrake for bådpropel: Høj vinkel (rake); Lav vinkel (rake); Medium vinkel (rake); Progressiv vinkel (rake); Andet
de: Blattneigung des Wasserfahrzeugpropellers: High Rake; Low Rake; Medium Rake; Progressiver Rake; Sonstige
th: มุมเอียงของใบพัดเรือ: มุมเรคสูง; มุมเรคต่ำ; มุมเรคปานกลาง; มุมเรคแบบโปรเกรสซีฟ; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Inclinação da pá da hélice da embarcação: Inclinação elevada; Inclinação baixa; Inclinação média; Inclinação progressiva; Outro
zh-TW: 船艇推進器葉片傾角: 高傾角; 低傾角; 中傾角; 漸進式傾角; 其他
ru: Угол наклона лопасти гребного винта водного транспорта: Большой угол откидки; Малый угол откидки; Средний угол откидки; Прогрессивный угол откидки; Другое
lt-LT: Vandens laivo sraigto menčių grėblys: Didelis polinkio kampas; Mažas polinkio kampas; Vidutinis polinkio kampas; Progresyvus polinkio kampas; Kita
nb: Vinkel på båtens propellblad: Høy rake; Lav rake; Medium rake; Progressiv rake; Annet
es: Inclinación de la pala de la hélice de la embarcación: Inclinación alta; Inclinación baja; Inclinación media; Inclinación progresiva; Otro
hu: Vízi jármű propellerének dőlésszöge: Nagy dőlésszög; Kis dőlésszög; Közepes dőlésszög; Progresszív dőlésszög; Egyéb
en: Watercraft propeller blade rake: High rake; Low rake; Medium rake; Progressive rake; Other
cs: Sklon listů lodního šroubu: Vysoký úhel; Nízký úhel; Střední úhel; Progresivní úhel; Jiný
it: Rake delle pale dell'elica del natante: Inclinazione elevata; Inclinazione ridotta; Inclinazione media; Inclinazione progressiva; Altro
tr: Deniz aracı pervane kanadı eğimi: Yüksek eğim (rake); Düşük eğim (rake); Orta eğim (rake); Kademeli eğim (rake); Diğer
el: Κλίση λεπίδας προπέλας σκάφους: Υψηλή γωνία κλίσης (high rake); Χαμηλή γωνία κλίσης (low rake); Μεσαία γωνία κλίσης (medium rake); Προοδευτική γωνία κλίσης (progressive rake); Άλλο
fr: Inclinaison des pales de l’hélice d’embarcation: Inclinaison élevée; Faible inclinaison; Inclinaison moyenne; Inclinaison progressive; Autre